Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,145
Quo warranto; letters patent; annulment; grounds.

An action of quo warranto may be instituted in the manner contemplated in sections 25-21,121 to 25-21,148, for the purpose of annulling or vacating any letters patent granted by the proper authorities of this state, where there is reason to believe that the same were obtained by fraud, or through mistake or ignorance of a material fact, or when the patentee, or those claiming under him, have done or omitted an act in violation of the terms and conditions on which the letters were granted, or have by any other means forfeited the interest acquired under the same.

R.S.1867, Code § 728, p. 519;

R.S.1913, § 8352;

C.S.1922, § 9304;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,136;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,145.